Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.020

Andy Hill cancer research endowment.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5455.SL) ***

(1) The Andy Hill cancer research endowment is created. The powers of the endowment are vested in and must be exercised by a board. The board consists of thirteen members appointed by the governor:

(a) Two members must be appointed from nominations submitted by the presidents of the University of Washington and Washington State University;

(b) Two members must be appointed from nominations submitted by the Fred Hutchinson cancer research center, Seattle cancer care alliance, and the Seattle children's research institute;

(c) Two members must be appointed from nominations submitted by patient advocacy organizations;

(d) Two members must be appointed from nominations submitted by representatives of businesses or industries engaged in the commercialization of life sciences research or cancer research;

(e) One member must be appointed from a list of at least three nominated by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(f) One member must be appointed from a list of at least three nominated by the president of the senate;

(g) One member must be appointed from nominations submitted by entities or systems that provide health care delivery services;

(h) One member must be appointed from nominations provided by private sector donors to the fund. However, the governor may reject all nominations and request a new list from which the governor must select the member; and

(i) The remaining member must be a member of the public.

(2) In soliciting nominations and appointing members, the governor must seek to identify individuals from throughout the state having relevant knowledge, experience, and expertise with regard to (a) cancer research, prevention, and care; (b) health care consumer issues; (c) government finance and budget; and (d) the commercialization of life sciences or cancer research. In soliciting nominations and appointing members, the governor must seek individuals who will contribute to the geographic diversity of the board, with the goal that at least five board members be from counties with a population less than one million persons. Appointments must be made on or before July 1, 2016.

(3) The term of a member is four years from the date of their appointment except the initial term of the members in subsection (1)(d) through (i) of this section must be two years to create a staggered appointment process. A member may be appointed to not more than two full consecutive terms. A member appointed by the governor may be removed by the governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The members may not be compensated but may be reimbursed, solely from the fund, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

(4) Seven members of the board constitute a quorum.

(5) The members must elect a chair, treasurer, and secretary annually, and other officers as the members determine necessary, and may adopt bylaws or rules for their own government.

(6) Meetings of the board must be held in accordance with the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or when a majority of the members so requests. Meetings of the board may be held at any location within or out of the state, and members may participate in a meeting of the board by means of a conference telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW 23B.08.200.

[ 2018 c 4 s 2; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 3.]